District of Columbia statutes.
1-623.40

Repealed

Administration.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2340, 25 DCR 5740
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 810(i), 42 DCR 3684
Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 1203(g), 48 DCR 6981
1981 Ed., § 1-624.40.
1973 Ed., § 1-353.40.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1103(g) of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).